Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB879.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5562. Concurrent jurisdiction to prosecute. (a) Jurisdiction.--(1) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General by the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, and in accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3), the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and institute criminal proceedings for a felony offense under this subchapter.(2) The Attorney General may submit a written request to 123456789101112131415161718 prosecute a felony offense under this subchapter in a criminal court or juvenile delinquency court. The request must be submitted to the district attorney with jurisdiction over the prosecution of the felony offense. (3) If the district attorney with jurisdiction over the prosecution of the felony offense fails to respond within 90 days to the request made under paragraph (2), the Attorney General shall send a subsequent written request by certified or registered mail, and, if the district attorney fails to respond to the subsequent request within 10 days of the date of the subsequent request, the request shall be deemed approved.(b) District attorney.--A district attorney with jurisdiction over the prosecution of the felony offense may request the Attorney General to investigate and institute criminal proceedings in a felony case under this subchapter.(c) Manual.--The Attorney General shall develop and maintain a manual of best practices for the investigation and institution of criminal proceedings under this subchapter that shall be made available on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0879PN0919 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122